src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verb-contracted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each verb:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable verbs belonging to FERTE_IV, GILLE_IV, DOHPPE_TV 

Tests:

  Verb - bállet: # FERTE_IV
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bállen
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bálle
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bállejit
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bálliiga
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bálliidet
    bállet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bálleje, bállejedje]
    bállet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [bálleleimme, bállešeimme]
    bállet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [bálleše, bállešedje, bállele, bálleledje]
    bállet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bálleš, bálleža]
    bállet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: bálležit
    bállet+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: bállemis

  Verb - balvet: # BORGE_IV
    balvet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: balve
    balvet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: balvii
    balvet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: balvejehkos
    balvet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3: [balvešii, balvelii]
    balvet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [balveš, balveža]
    balvet+V+IV+Ger: [balvedin, balvediin, balvedettiin]
    balvet+V+IV+PrfPrc: balven
    balvet+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: balvejuvvot
    balvet+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: balvegođii
    balvet+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: balvestalai
    balvet+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/easti+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: balvesteastá
    balvet+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: balvemis

  Verb - biggot: # BASSO_IV
#    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: biggon
    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: biggo
    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: biggojit
#    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bigguiga
#    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bigguidet
    biggot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [biggoje, biggojedje]
#    biggot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: biggo
#    biggot+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: biggojehkoset
#    biggot+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [biggoleimme, biggošeimme]
    biggot+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [biggoše, biggošedje, biggole, biggoledje]
    biggot+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [biggoš, biggoža]
    biggot+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: biggožit
    biggot+V+IV+Ger: [biggodin, biggodiin, biggodettiin]
    biggot+V+IV+PrfPrc: biggon
#    biggot+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [biggogohten, biggošgohten]
#    biggot+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: biggostalaiga
#    biggot+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: biggoheasttát
    biggot+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: biggomis
#    biggot+V+IV+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [biggodit, biggodat]

  Verb - rostet: # GILLE_IV
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rosten
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roste
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rostejit
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rostiiga
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rostiidet
    rostet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [rosteje, rostejedje]
    rostet+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: roste
    rostet+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: rostejehkoset
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [rosteleimme, rostešeimme]
    rostet+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [rosteše, rostešedje, rostele, rosteledje]
    rostet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [rosteš, rosteža]
    rostet+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: rostežit
    rostet+V+IV+Ger: [rostedin, rostediin, rostedettiin]
    rostet+V+IV+PrfPrc: rosten
    rostet+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: rostejuvvot
    rostet+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [rostegohten, rostešgohten]
    rostet+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rostestalaiga
    rostet+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rosteheasttát
    rostet+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: rostemis
    rostet+V+IV+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [rostedit, rostedat]


  Verb - bikšát: # CIRRO_IV
#    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bikšán
    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bikšá
    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bikšájit
#    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: bikšáiga
#    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: bikšáidet
    bikšát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [bikšáje, bikšájedje]
#    bikšát+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: bikšá
#    bikšát+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: bikšájehkoset
#    bikšát+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [bikšáleimme, bikšášeimme]
    bikšát+V+IV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [bikšáše, bikšášedje, bikšále, bikšáledje]
    bikšát+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [bikšáš, bikšáža]
    bikšát+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: bikšážit
    bikšát+V+IV+Ger: [bikšádin, bikšádiin, bikšádettiin]
    bikšát+V+IV+PrfPrc: bikšán
    bikšát+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: bikšájuvvot
#    bikšát+V+IV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [bikšágohten, bikšášgohten]
#    bikšát+V+IV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: bikšástalaiga
#    bikšát+V+IV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bikšáheasttát
    bikšát+V+IV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: bikšámis
#    bikšát+V+IV+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [bikšádit, bikšádat]


  Verb - hoitát: # DOHPPE_TV
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoitán
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hoitá
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hoitájit
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: hoitáiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hoitáidet
    hoitát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hoitáje, hoitájedje]
    hoitát+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: hoitá
    hoitát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: hoitájehkoset
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [hoitáleimme, hoitášeimme]
    hoitát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [hoitáše, hoitášedje, hoitále, hoitáledje]
    hoitát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [hoitáš, hoitáža]
    hoitát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: hoitážit
    hoitát+V+TV+Ger: [hoitádin, hoitádiin, hoitádettiin]
    hoitát+V+TV+PrfPrc: hoitán
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: hoitájuvvot
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [hoitágohten, hoitášgohten]
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: hoitástalaiga
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hoitáheasttát
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: hoitámis
    hoitát+V+TV+Der/halla+V+Sup: [hoitáhalažit, hoitáhattažit]


  Verb - vuordát: # MUITA_TV
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuordán
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuordá
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuordájit
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuordáiga
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuordáidet
    vuordát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vuordáje, vuordájedje]
    vuordát+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: vuordá
    vuordát+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: vuordájehkoset
    vuordát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Du1: [vuordáleimme, vuordášeimme]
    vuordát+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [vuordáše, vuordášedje, vuordále, vuordáledje]
    vuordát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [vuordáš, vuordáža]
    vuordát+V+TV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vuordážit
    vuordát+V+TV+Ger: [vuordádin, vuordádiin, vuordádettiin]
    vuordát+V+TV+PrfPrc: vuordán
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: vuordájuvvot
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vuordágohten, vuordášgohten]
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/st+V+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuordástalaiga
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/h+V+Der/easti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuordáheasttát
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc: vuordámis
    vuordát+V+TV+Der/halla+V+Sup: [vuordáhalažit, vuordáhattažit]
